dev/mt_wiktionary/nounNoNumber.all.fat.dix
  <!-- astroloġija; astroloġija; 1 -->
    <pardef n="astroloġija__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- qaqoċċa; qaqoċċa; 1 -->
    <pardef n="qaqoċċa__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- xatt_il-baħar; xatt_il-baħar; 1 -->
    <pardef n="xatt_il-baħar__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ħawħa; ħawħa; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ħawħa__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- arkivju; arkivju; 1 -->
    <pardef n="arkivju__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- arkivju; arkivju; 1 -->
    <pardef n="arkivju__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- sptar; sptar; 1 -->
    <pardef n="sptar__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- sptar; sptar; 1 -->
    <pardef n="sptar__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ilsien; ilsien; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ilsien__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ilsien; ilsien; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ilsien__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- matematiku; matematiku; 1 -->
    <pardef n="matematiku__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- matematiku; matematiku; 1 -->
    <pardef n="matematiku__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ċess; ċess; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ċess__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ċess; ċess; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ċess__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- paġna; paġna; 1 -->
    <pardef n="paġna__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- paġna; paġna; 1 -->
    <pardef n="paġna__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- rebbiegħa; rebbiegħa; 1 -->
    <pardef n="rebbiegħa__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- rebbiegħa; rebbiegħa; 1 -->
    <pardef n="rebbiegħa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- assimilazzjoni; assimilazzjoni; 1 -->
    <pardef n="assimilazzjoni__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- assimilazzjoni; assimilazzjoni; 1 -->
    <pardef n="assimilazzjoni__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- mejda; mejda; 1 -->
    <pardef n="mejda__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- aġġettiv; aġġettiv; 1 -->
    <pardef n="aġġettiv__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- aġġettiv; aġġettiv; 1 -->
    <pardef n="aġġettiv__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- gobon; gobon; 1 -->
    <pardef n="gobon__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- evalwazzjoni; evalwazzjoni; 1 -->
    <pardef n="evalwazzjoni__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- xkupilja_tas-snien; xkupilja_tas-snien; 1 -->
    <pardef n="xkupilja_tas-snien__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- għarab; għarab; 1 -->
    <pardef n="għarab__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- għarab; għarab; 1 -->
    <pardef n="għarab__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- oċean; oċean; 1 -->
    <pardef n="oċean__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- pulizija; pulizija; 1 -->
    <pardef n="pulizija__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- borża; borża; 1 -->
    <pardef n="borża__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- laringa; laringa; 1 -->
    <pardef n="laringa__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- Taljan; Taljan; 1 -->
    <pardef n="Taljan__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- Taljan; Taljan; 1 -->
    <pardef n="Taljan__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- bettieħa; bettieħa; 1 -->
    <pardef n="bettieħa__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- dukessi; dukessi; 1 -->
    <pardef n="dukessi__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- wirdiena; wirdiena; 1 -->
    <pardef n="wirdiena__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- wirdiena; wirdiena; 1 -->
    <pardef n="wirdiena__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- indiċi; indiċi; 1 -->
    <pardef n="indiċi__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- indiċi; indiċi; 1 -->
    <pardef n="indiċi__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- froġa; froġa; 1 -->
    <pardef n="froġa__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="astroloġija"><i>astroloġija</i><par n="astroloġija__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="qaqoċċa"><i>qaqoċċa</i><par n="qaqoċċa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="xatt_il-baħar"><i>xatt_il-baħar</i><par n="xatt_il-baħar__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ħawħa"><i>ħawħa</i><par n="ħawħa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="arkivju"><i>arkivju</i><par n="arkivju__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="arkivju"><i>arkivju</i><par n="arkivju__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="sptar"><i>sptar</i><par n="sptar__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sptar"><i>sptar</i><par n="sptar__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ilsien"><i>ilsien</i><par n="ilsien__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ilsien"><i>ilsien</i><par n="ilsien__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="matematiku"><i>matematiku</i><par n="matematiku__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="matematiku"><i>matematiku</i><par n="matematiku__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ċess"><i>ċess</i><par n="ċess__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċess"><i>ċess</i><par n="ċess__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="paġna"><i>paġna</i><par n="paġna__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="paġna"><i>paġna</i><par n="paġna__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="rebbiegħa"><i>rebbiegħa</i><par n="rebbiegħa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="rebbiegħa"><i>rebbiegħa</i><par n="rebbiegħa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="assimilazzjoni"><i>assimilazzjoni</i><par n="assimilazzjoni__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="assimilazzjoni"><i>assimilazzjoni</i><par n="assimilazzjoni__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="mejda"><i>mejda</i><par n="mejda__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="aġġettiv"><i>aġġettiv</i><par n="aġġettiv__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="aġġettiv"><i>aġġettiv</i><par n="aġġettiv__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="gobon"><i>gobon</i><par n="gobon__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="evalwazzjoni"><i>evalwazzjoni</i><par n="evalwazzjoni__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xkupilja_tas-snien"><i>xkupilja_tas-snien</i><par n="xkupilja_tas-snien__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="għarab"><i>għarab</i><par n="għarab__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għarab"><i>għarab</i><par n="għarab__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="oċean"><i>oċean</i><par n="oċean__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="pulizija"><i>pulizija</i><par n="pulizija__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="borża"><i>borża</i><par n="borża__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="laringa"><i>laringa</i><par n="laringa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Taljan"><i>Taljan</i><par n="Taljan__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="Taljan"><i>Taljan</i><par n="Taljan__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="bettieħa"><i>bettieħa</i><par n="bettieħa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="dukessi"><i>dukessi</i><par n="dukessi__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="wirdiena"><i>wirdiena</i><par n="wirdiena__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="wirdiena"><i>wirdiena</i><par n="wirdiena__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="indiċi"><i>indiċi</i><par n="indiċi__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="indiċi"><i>indiċi</i><par n="indiċi__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="froġa"><i>froġa</i><par n="froġa__n_f"/></e>
